Utah statutes.
4-23-8.   Proceeds of sheep fee -- Refund of sheep fees -- Annual audit of
books, records, and accounts.
(1) (a) Subject to the other provisions of this Subsection (1), the
commissioner may spend an amount each year from the proceeds collected from
the fee imposed on sheep for the promotion, advancement, and protection of the
sheep interests of the state.
(b)  The amount described in Subsection (1)(a) shall be the equivalent to an
amount that:
(i)  equals or exceeds 18 cents per head; and
(ii)  equals or is less than 25 cents per head.
(c)  The commissioner shall set the amount described in Subsection (1)(a):
(i)  on or before January 1 of each year; and
(ii)  in consultation with one or more statewide organizations that represent
persons who grow wool.
(d)  All costs to promote or advance sheep interests shall be deducted from
the total revenue collected before calculating the annual budget request,
which shall be made by the Division of Wildlife Resources as specified in
Section 4-23-9.
(e)  A sheep fee is refundable in an amount equal to that part of the fee used
to promote, advance, or protect sheep interests.
(f)  A refund claim shall be filed with the department on or before January 1
of the year immediately succeeding the year for which the fee was paid.
(g)  A refund claim shall be certified by the department to the state
treasurer for payment from the Agricultural and Wildlife Damage Prevention
Account created in Section 4-23-7.5.
(2)  Any expense incurred by the department in administering refunds shall be
paid from funds allocated for the promotion, advancement, and protection of
the sheep interests of the state.
(3) (a)  The books, records, and accounts of the Utah Woolgrowers Association,
or any other organization which receives funds from the agricultural and
wildlife damage prevention account, for the purpose of promoting, advancing,
or protecting the sheep interests of the state, shall be audited at least once
annually by a licensed accountant.
(b)  The results of this audit shall be submitted to the commissioner.
